District of Columbia statutes.
2-381.31

Immunity for Year 2000 system failures.

(a)

No cause of action at law or in equity, nor any administrative action shall be maintained against the District government or its officers or employees, arising from a Year 2000 system failure.

(b)

No cause of action at law or in equity, nor any administrative action shall be maintained against a District government vendor, arising from a Year 2000 system failure caused primarily by the vendor’s use of computer hardware, software, or equipment that is not Year 2000 complaint [compliant] and which is owned or provided by the District government, unless the action is maintained by the District government.

(c)

All District government contracts executed after April 20, 1999 shall include a warranty of Year 2000 compliance for any goods or services provided pursuant to the contract, and shall state that the vendor is liable for any damages if the goods and services are not Year 2000 compliant.

(d)

For the purposes of this subchapter:

(1)

The term “Year 2000 compliance or compliant” means the capability of a computer software program, database, network, information system, computer device, or any equipment using microchips, to interpret, produce, generate, calculate, or to correctly account for a date in the year 2000 or in subsequent years.

(2)

The term “Year 2000 system failure” means the failure of a computer software program, database, network, information system, computer device, or any equipment using microchips, to interpret, produce, generate, calculate, or to correctly account for a date in the year 2000 or in subsequent years.

History

Apr. 20, 1999, D.C. Law 12-244, § 2, 46 DCR 1080
Sept. 26, 2012, D.C. Law 19-171, § 205, 59 DCR 6190

Prior Codifications

2001 Ed., § 2-323.01.
1981 Ed., § 1-1188.51.

Effect of Amendments

The 2012 amendment by D.C. Law 19-171 deleted “Notwithstanding § 2-308.01” at the beginning of (a); and made a related change.